src/nob-lex.txt
! ============================= !
! Basic file for Bokmål grammar !
! ============================= !


Multichar_Symbols
 +N +A +Adv +V
 +CS +CC +Interj +Pcle +Pr +IM
 +Pers +Dem +Interr +Refl +Recipr +Rel
 +Indef +Def +Poss
 +Sg +Pl
 +Pron +Nom +Acc +Dat +Det
 +Msc +Fem +Neu
 +Pos +Comp +Superl +Clt
 +Pass +Ind +Prs +Prt +Imp
 +Inf +PrsPtc +PrfPtc
 +Interj 
 +Prop +Fem +Mal +Plc +Org +Ani
 +CLB +PUNCT +HYPH +LEFT +RIGHT
! +X ! denoting not-checked.

 X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9
 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 Q8 Q9
 Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 Y9
 Z1 Z2 Z3 Z4 Z5 Z6 Z7 Z8 Z9


! =================================================
! Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files
! =================================================
  
LEXICON Root
 NounRoot ;
 ProperNoun ;
 AdjectiveRoot ;
 VerbRoot ;
 Adverb ;
! Particle ;
 Subjunction ;
 Conjunction ;
 Preposition ;
 Interjection ;
 Pronoun ;
 Determiner ;
 Numeral ;
 Punctuation ;
 Abbreviation ;



! ======================
! Sublexica for NounRoot
! ======================


! Basic paradigms
! ===============

! Masculines
! ----------

LEXICON x 
!+X: m1 ; !Temporarily excluding the xX
 m1 ;     ! change line back if needed.


LEXICON mX
 +N+Msc: K ;

LEXICON m1 ! dag, hane
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;

LEXICON m1X
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;

LEXICON m1b ! dam
 +N+Msc+Sg:mX4 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:m er-ene ;

LEXICON m1V ! sko
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: 0-ene ;

LEXICON m2 ! lærer
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: e-ne ;

LEXICON m3 ! onkel
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X1 er-ene ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-

LEXICON m3V ! meter
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X1 0-ene ;

LEXICON KOLLEGA
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X2 er-ene ; ! delete a

LEXICON KONTO
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en K ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X2i 0-ene ; ! delete o
 +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ; ! Regular pl

LEXICON RADIUS
 +N+Msc+Sg:%>us 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>en K ; ! short def
 +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ; ! Regular pl

LEXICON BROR
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:r%>X3 e-ene ; 

LEXICON DATTER
 +N+Fem+Sg+Indef:datter # ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Def:datra # ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Indef:døtre # ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Def:døtrene # ;

LEXICON MANN
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:Z1 0-ene ;

! Feminines
! ---------

LEXICON fx ! Former vx, awaiting classification.
 f1 ;

LEXICON f1 ! myr, krone
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en ; ! myren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl: er-ene ;

LEXICON f1X ! bok
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en ; ! boken !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;

LEXICON f1V ! mus
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en ; ! musen !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl: 0-ene ;
 
LEXICON f3 ! lever
 +N+Fem+Sg:X1 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en ; ! levren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:X1 er-ene ;
 

! Neuters
! -------

LEXICON nX ! styrbord
 +N+Neu: K ;

LEXICON n1 ! hus
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ene-a ;

LEXICON n1b ! rom
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m 0-ene-a ;

LEXICON n2 ! eple, salt
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: er-ene ;

LEXICON n2b ! program
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m 0-er-ene ;

LEXICON n2c ! album, kontor
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-er-ene ;

LEXICON n2s ! mørke
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;

LEXICON n3 ! middel
 +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 er-ene ;

LEXICON n3b ! lager
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 e-ene ;

LEXICON n3c ! fe
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ne ;

LEXICON n4 ! kriterium
 +N+Neu+Sg:X5 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 er-ene ;

LEXICON n4b ! faktum
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 a-aene ;


! Lexica for definiteness declension
! ==================================

LEXICON a-aene
 +Indef:%>a K ;
 +Def:%>aene K ;

LEXICON e-ne
 +Indef:%>e K ;
 +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON e-ene
 +Indef:%>e K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;
 
LEXICON er-ene
 +Indef:%>er K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-a
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>a K ;

LEXICON 0-en
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>en K ;

LEXICON 0-ene
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-er-ene
 +Indef: K ;
 +Indef:%>er K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-ne
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON 0-et
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>et K ;

LEXICON 0-ene-a
 +Indef: K ;
 +Def:%>ene K ;
 +Def:%>a K ;

LEXICON en
 +Indef: K ; ! en dør, sukk.
 +Def:%>en K ;



! =============================
! Sublexica for adjective roots
! =============================


! Basic paradigms
! ===============

LEXICON a1 ! 
 +A: positive ;
 +A: a-neuter ;
 +A: a-grade ;

LEXICON a2 ! 
 +A: positive ;
 +A: a-no-neuter ;
 +A: a-grade ;

LEXICON a3 ! 
 +A: positive ;
 +A: a-no-neuter ;

! Sublexica
! =========

LEXICON positive
 +Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
 +Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
 +Pos+Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Pos+Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Pos+Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Pos+Pl+Def:%>e # ;

LEXICON a-neuter ! fint
 +Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:%>Q3t # ;
 
LEXICON a-no-neuter ! vennlig
 +Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef: # ;

LEXICON a-grade
 +Comp:%>ere # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>est # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>este # ;

! ========================
! Sublexica for verb roots
! ========================

! ----------
! Weak verbs
! ----------

LEXICON vx 
! +X: v1 ; ! ditto
     v1 ;

LEXICON v13 ! sveve -> svevet, svevde.
 v1 ;
 v3 ;

LEXICON v1 ! kaste
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres ;
 +V: a-et-pret ;

 
LEXICON v2 ! blåse, studere
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres ;
 +V: te-pret ;

LEXICON v3 ! leve
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres ;
 +V: de-pret ;

LEXICON v4 ! ro, bie
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: r-pres ;
 +V: dde-pret ;

LEXICON v1-s ! undres
 +Inf: # ;
 +Ind+Prs: # ;
 +Ind+Prt: # ;
 +PrfPtc: # ;

LEXICON v2-s ! føles, synes
 +Inf: # ;
 +Ind+Prs: # ;
 +Ind+Prt:Q1 # ;
 +PrfPtc:Q1 # ;

LEXICON v3-s ! trives
 +Inf: # ;
 +Ind+Prs: # ;
 +Ind+Prt:Q2 # ;
 +PrfPtc:Q2 # ;


! ============ !
! Strong verbs !
! ============ !

! Not done.

! ========== !
! Inflection !
! ========== !


LEXICON vs3
 +Inf: # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>r # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>Q3 # ; ! bar, æ>a and e deletion
 +PrsPtc:%>nde K ;
 +PrfPtc:%>Q3t # ; ! båret, æ>å, no e deletion



! ---------------------
! Conjugation sublexica
! ---------------------

LEXICON inf-prsptc
 +Inf: # ;
 +Imp:%>Q3 # ;
 +PrsPtc:%>ende # ;
 
LEXICON regpres
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;

LEXICON r-pres
 +Ind+Prs:%>r # ;

LEXICON a-et-pret
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>et # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>et # ;

LEXICON te-pret
 +Ind+Prt:%>Q3te # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>Q3t # ;

LEXICON de-pret
 +Ind+Prt:%>Q3de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>Q3d # ;

LEXICON dde-pret
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dd # ;


! =======
! Clitics
! =======

LEXICON K
 +Clt:%>s # ;
 # ;
